Utah statutes.
40-10-23.   Time for bringing criminal proceeding.
No criminal proceeding based upon violation of this chapter, or any rule,
regulation, or order issued under this chapter, shall be commenced or
maintained unless it shall have been commenced within five years from the date
of the alleged violation.
